sv: Möbler: Möbler för bebisar och småbarn; Sängar och tillbehör; Bänkar; Skåp och lagring; Rullbord; Stolstillbehör; Stolar; Dagbäddar; Hemmabiomöbler och TV-bänkar; Möbelset; Futoner; Kontorsmöbler; Tillbehör till kontorsmöbler; Ottomaner; Utomhusmöbler; Tillbehör till utomhusmöbler; Piedestaler och socklar; Tillbehör till rumsavdelare; Rumsavdelare; Hyllanordningar; Tillbehör till hyllmöbler; Sofftillbehör; Soffor; Bordstillbehör; Bord
ja: 家具: ベビー用家具; ベッド・ベッド用品; ベンチ・スツール; 収納家具; ワゴン; 椅子関連用品; 椅子; デイベッド; テレビ台・オーディオラック; 家具セット; フトンソファ; オフィス家具; オフィス家具関連用品; オットマン; 屋外用家具; 屋外用家具関連用品; 台座・ディスプレイ台; 間仕切り・パーティション関連用品; 間仕切り・パーティション; 棚・シェルフ; 棚・シェルフ関連用品; ソファ関連用品; ソファ; テーブル関連用品; テーブル
de: Möbel: Baby- & Kleinkindmöbel; Betten & Zubehör; Sitzbänke; Schränke; Kücheninseln & Küchenwagen; Stuhlzubehör; Stühle; Tagesbetten; Möbel für Unterhaltungselektronik; Möbelgarnituren; Futons; Büromöbel; Zubehör für Büromöbel; Polsterhocker; Gartenmöbel; Gartenmöbelzubehör; Podeste & Sockel; Raumteilerzubehör; Raumteiler; Regalsysteme; Regalzubehör; Sofa-Zubehör; Sofas; Tischzubehör; Tische
hu: Bútor: Baba- és csecsemőbútorok; Ágyak és kiegészítők; Padok; Szekrények és tárolók; Szekerek és szigetek; Székkiegészítők; Székek; Nyugágyak; Szórakoztató központok és TV-állványok; Bútorkészletek; Futonok; Irodai bútorok; Irodabútor-kiegészítők; Ottománok; Kültéri bútorok; Kültéribútor-kiegészítők; Talapzatok és posztamensek; Szobaelválasztó kiegészítők; Szobaelválasztók; Polcok; Polckiegészítők; Kanapékiegészítők; Kanapék; Asztali kiegészítők; Asztalok
lt-LT: Baldai: Baldai kūdikiams ir mažiems vaikams; Lovos ir priedai; Suoliukai; Spintelės ir sandėliavimas; Vežimėliai ir salos; Kėdžių priedai; Kėdės; Miegamosios sofos; Pramogų centrai ir televizorių stovai; Baldų komplektai; Futonai; Biuro baldai; Biuro baldų priedai; Otomanai; Lauko baldai; Lauko baldų priedai; Pjedestalai ir postamentai; Kambario pertvarų priedai; Kambario pertvaros; Lentynos; Lentynų priedai; Sofų priedai; Sofos; Stalų priedai; Stalai
ko: 가구: 영유아 가구; 침구/부대용품; 벤치; 캐비닛/수납장; 카트/아일랜드; 의자 부대용품; 의자; 데이 베드; TV 선반/스탠드; 가구 세트; 푸톤; 사무용 가구; 사무용 가구 부대용품; 오토만; 야외용 가구; 야외용 가구 부대용품; 페데스탈 및 플린스; 칸막이 부대용품; 칸막이; 선반 재료; 선반 부대용품; 소파 부대용품; 소파; 테이블 부대용품; 테이블
da: Møbler: Møbler til baby og småbørn; Senge og tilbehør; Bænke; Skabe og opbevaring; Vogne og køkkenøer; Tilbehør til stole; Stole; Daybeds; Borde til underholdningscentre og tv; Møbelsæt; Futoner; Kontormøbler; Tilbehør til kontormøbler; Ottomaner; Havemøbler; Havemøbler – tilbehør; Piedestaler og sokler; Ruminddeler – tilbehør; Ruminddelere; Hylder; Tilbehør til hylder; Tilbehør til sofaer; Sofaer; Borde – tilbehør; Borde
fr: Meubles: Mobilier pour bébés et tout-petits; Lits et accessoires; Bancs; Armoires et meubles de rangement; Chariots et îlots; Accessoires pour fauteuils; Chaises; Canapé-lits; Meubles audio/vidéo et pour home cinéma; Ensembles de meubles; Futons; Meubles de bureau; Accessoires pour meubles de bureau; Poufs; Meubles de jardin; Accessoires pour meubles d’extérieur; Piédestaux et socles; Accessoires pour la division de pièces; Séparateurs de pièces; Étagères; Accessoires pour étagères; Accessoires pour canapés; Canapés; Accessoires pour tables; Tables
bg-BG: Мебели: Мебели за бебета и малки деца; Легла и аксесоари; Пейки; Шкафове и съхранение; Колички и острови; Аксесоари за столове; Столове; Дневни легла; Развлекателни центрове и стойки за телевизори; Комплекти мебели; Футони; Офис мебели; Аксесоари за офис мебели; Отоманки; Градински мебели; Аксесоари за външно обзавеждане; Пиедестали и постаменти; Аксесоари за преграда за стая; Прегради на стаи; Рафтове; Стелажни рафтове и первази; Аксесоари за дивани; Дивани; Аксесоари за маса; Маси
pl: Meble: Meble dla dzieci i niemowląt; Łóżka i akcesoria; Ławki; Szafy i przechowywanie; Wózki i wyspy; Akcesoria do krzeseł; Krzesła i fotele; Leżanki daybed; Meble RTV; Zestawy mebli; Futony; Meble biurowe; Akcesoria do mebli biurowych; Otomany; Meble zewnętrzne; Akcesoria do mebli zewnętrznych; Cokoły i postumenty; Akcesoria do przepierzeń; Przegrody pokojowe; Półki i regały; Akcesoria do półek i regałów; Akcesoria do sof; Sofy; Akcesoria stołowe; Stoły
pt-PT: Mobiliário: Mobiliário de bebé e criança; Camas e acessórios; Bancadas; Armários e armazenamento; Carrinhos e ilhas; Acessórios de cadeira; Cadeiras; Divã; Centros de diversão e suporte de televisão; Conjuntos de mobiliário; Futons; Mobiliário de escritório; Acessórios de mobiliário de escritório; Otomanas; Mobiliário de exterior; Acessórios de mobiliário de exterior; Pedestais e plintos; Acessórios de biombos; Biombos; Prateleiras; Acessórios para prateleiras; Acessórios de sofá; Sofás; Acessórios de mesa; Mesas
nb: Møbler: Møbler for baby og barn; Senger og tilbehør; Benker; Skap og lagring; Vogner og øyer; Stoltilbehør; Stoler; Dagsenger; Underholdningssentre og TV-stativer; Møbelsett; Futoner; Kontormøbler; Tilbehør til kontormøbler; Ottomaner; Utendørsmøbler; Tilbehør for utemøbeler; Pidestaller og sokler; Tilbehør for romdelere; Romdelere; Hyller; Hylletilbehør; Sofatilbehør; Sofaer; Bordtilbehør; Bord
tr: Mobilyalar: Bebek ve Küçük Çocuk Mobilyaları; Yataklar ve Aksesuarlar; Banklar; Dolaplar ve Saklama Mobilyaları; Tekerlekli Servis Sehpaları ve Mutfak Adaları; Koltuk Aksesuarları; Sandalyeler; Divanlar; Eğlence Merkezleri ve TV Sehpaları; Mobilya Takımları; Futonlar; Ofis Mobilyaları; Ofis Mobilyası Aksesuarları; Sedirler; Bahçe Mobilyaları; Bahçe Mobilya Aksesuarları; Kaide ve altlıklar; Oda Bölme Aksesuarları; Oda Bölücüler; Raflar; Raf Aksesuarları; Kanepe Aksesuarları; Kanepeler; Masa Aksesuarları; Masalar
it: Arredamento: Mobili per bebè e bimbi; Letti e accessori; Panche; Armadietti e portaoggetti; Carrelli e isole; Accessori per sedie; Sedie; Lettini; Postazioni multimediali e svago; Set di mobili; Futon; Mobili da ufficio; Accessori per arredamento da ufficio; Ottomane; Arredi per esterno; Accessori per mobili da esterni; Piedistalli e plinti; Accessori per la separazione di ambienti; Separè; Scaffalature; Accessori per scaffali; Accessori per divani; Divani; Accessori da tavolo; Tavoli
nl: Meubelen: Meubelen voor baby's en peuters; Bedden en accessoires; Banken; Kasten en opbergmeubelen; Trolleys; Stoelaccessoires; Stoelen; Dagbedden; Entertainment- en mediasystemen; Meubelsets; Futons; Kantoormeubelen; Accessoires voor kantoormeubilair; Poefs; Buitenmeubelen; Accessoires voor buitenmeubilair; Sokkels en plinten; Accessoires voor kamerafscheidingen; Kamerafscheidingen; Planken; Accessoires voor planken; Accessoires voor sofa's; Sofa's; Tafelaccessoires; Tafels
ro-RO: Mobilier: Mobilier pentru bebeluși și copii mici; Paturi și accesorii; Bănci; Dulăpioare și spații de depozitare; Cărucioare și corpuri de mobilier tip insulă; Accesorii pentru scaune; Scaune; Paturi de zi; Centre de divertisment și standuri pentru televizor; Seturi de mobilier; Saltele japoneze; Mobilier de birou; Accesorii pentru mobilier de birou; Canapele tip otoman; Mobilier de exterior; Accesorii pentru mobilier de exterior; Piedestale și socluri; Accesorii pentru separatoare de cameră; Separatoare de cameră; Rafturi; Accesorii pentru rafturi; Accesorii pentru canapele; Canapele; Accesorii pentru mese; Mese
sl-SI: Pohištvo: Pohištvo za dojenčke in malčke; Postelje in dodatki; Klopi; Omare in shranjevanje; Vozički in otoki; Dodatki za stole; Stoli; Kavč postelje; TV omare in stojala za TV; Pohištveni kompleti; Futoni; Pisarniško pohištvo; Dodatki za pisarniško pohištvo; Otomani; Zunanje pohištvo; Dodatki za zunanje pohištvo; Podstavki in podnožja; Dodatki za pregrade prostorov; Pregrade prostorov; Police; Dodatki za police; Dodatki za sedežne garniture; Sedežne garniture; Dodatki za mize; Mize
vi: Đồ gỗ: Đồ nội thất cho trẻ sơ sinh và trẻ nhỏ; Phòng ngủ và phụ kiện phòng ngủ; Ghế dài; Tủ và đồ đựng; Tủ gỗ có chân đẩy; Phụ kiện ghế; Ghế; Đi-văng; Tủ và kệ tivi; Bộ đồ nội thất; Giường ghế bọc nệm; Nội thất văn phòng; Phụ kiện nội thất văn phòng; Ghế dài bọc nệm; Đồ gỗ ngoài trời; Phụ kiện nội thất ngoài trời; Bệ và chân đế; Phụ kiện vách ngăn phòng; Vách chia phòng; Giá; Phụ kiện kệ; Phụ kiện ghế sofa; Ghế sofa; Phụ kiện cho bàn; Bàn nội thất
zh-CN: 家具: 婴幼儿家具; 床具与配件; 长椅; 柜子/储物; 可移动置物架; 椅子配件; 椅子; 坐卧两用长椅; 娱乐中心/电视柜; 家具套装; 日式床垫/折叠沙发床; 办公家具; 办公家具配件; 沙发凳; 户外家具; 户外家具配件; 底座与柱基; 房间隔板配件; 屏风/隔屏; 搁架; 架子配件; 沙发配件; 沙发; 桌子配件; 桌子
el: Έπιπλα: Βρεφικά & παιδικά έπιπλα; Κρεβάτια & αξεσουάρ; Πάγκοι; Ντουλάπια & αποθήκευση; Καρότσια & νησίδες; Αξεσουάρ καρέκλας; Καρέκλες; Καναπέδες-κρεβάτια; Κέντρα ψυχαγωγίας & βάσεις τηλεόρασης; Σετ επίπλων; Φουτόν; Έπιπλα γραφείου; Αξεσουάρ επίπλων γραφείου; Ντιβάνια; Έπιπλα εξωτερικού χώρου; Αξεσουάρ επίπλων εξωτερικού χώρου; Βάθρα και πλίνθοι; Αξεσουάρ διαχωριστικών δωματίου; Διαχωριστικά δωματίου; Ράφια; Αξεσουάρ ραφιών; Αξεσουάρ καναπέ; Καναπέδες; Αξεσουάρ τραπεζιού; Τραπέζια
th: เฟอร์นิเจอร์: เฟอร์นิเจอร์สำหรับทารกและเด็กเล็ก; เตียงและอุปกรณ์; ม้านั่ง; ตู้และที่จัดเก็บ; โต๊ะเตรียมอาหารและรถเข็นอาหาร; อุปกรณ์เก้าอี้; เก้าอี้; โซฟากึ่งเตียงนอน; ชั้นใหญ่วางทีวี; ชุดเฟอร์นิเจอร์; โซฟาแบบปรับนอนได้; เฟอร์นิเจอร์สำนักงาน; อุปกรณ์เฟอร์นิเจอร์สำนักงาน; เก้าอี้ออตโตมัน; เฟอร์นิเจอร์กลางแจ้ง; ของตกแต่งเฟอร์นิเจอร์กลางแจ้ง; แท่นโชว์และฐานตั้ง; อุปกรณ์กั้นห้อง; ฉากกั้นห้อง; ชั้น; อุปกรณ์ชั้นวาง; อุปกรณ์โซฟา; โซฟา; อุปกรณ์โต๊ะ; โต๊ะอาหาร
pt-BR: Móveis: Móveis para bebês; Camas e acessórios; Bancos; Armários e armazenamento; Carrinhos; Acessórios para cadeiras; Cadeiras; Daybeds; Centros de entretenimento e mídia; Conjuntos de móveis; Futons; Móveis para escritório; Acessórios de mobiliário para escritório; Pufes; Móveis para exteriores; Acessórios para móveis de jardim; Pedestais e plintos; Acessórios para divisórias; Paredes divisórias; Estantes; Acessórios para prateleiras; Acessórios para sofá; Sofás; Acessórios para mesas; Mesas
es: Mobiliario: Mobiliario para bebés y niños pequeños; Camas y accesorios; Bancos; Armarios y almacenamiento; Carros e islas; Accesorios para sillas; Sillas; Tumbonas; Centros de entretenimiento y multimedia; Conjuntos de mobiliario; Futones; Mobiliario de oficina; Accesorios para mobiliario de oficina; Otomanas; Mobiliario de exterior; Accesorios para mobiliario de exterior; Pedestales y plintos; Accesorios para divisores de ambientes; Divisores de ambientes; Estanterías; Accesorios para estanterías; Accesorios para sofás; Sofás; Accesorios para mesas; Mesas
cs: Nábytek: Nábytek pro děti a kojence; Postele a doplňky; Lavice; Skříně a úložné prostory; Policové vozíky; Příslušenství k židlím; Židle; Lehátka; Zábavní a multimediální centra; Sady nábytku; Sedačky; Kancelářský nábytek; Příslušenství ke kancelářskému nábytku; Otomany; Zahradní nábytek; Venkovní nábytek – příslušenství; Podstavce a sokly; Pokojové dělicí stěny – příslušenství; Dělicí příčky; Police; Příslušenství k policím; Příslušenství k pohovkám; Pohovky; Stoly – příslušenství; Stoly
hr-HR: Namještaj: Namještaj za bebe i malu djecu; Kreveti i dodaci; Klupe; Elementi i pohrana; Kolica i otoci; Pribor za stolice; Stolice; Kaučevi; Multimedijski regali i postolja za TV; Kompleti namještaja; Futoni; Uredski namještaj; Pribor za uredski namještaj; Taburei; Vanjski namještaj; Pribor za vanjski namještaj; Postolja; Pribor za sobne pregrade; Sobne pregrade; Police; Pribor za police; Dodaci za sofe; Sofe; Pribor za stolove; Stolovi
fi: Huonekalut: Vauvojen ja leikki-ikäisten huonekalut; Sängyt ja tarvikkeet; Penkit; Kaapit ja säilytys; Apupöydät ja saarekkeet; Tuolien lisätarvikkeet; Tuolit; Vuodetuolit; Viihdekeskukset ja TV-telineet; Huonekalusetit; Futonit; Toimistokalusteet; Toimistokalustetarvikkeet; Säilytys­sängyt; Ulkokalusteet; Ulkokalusteiden tarvikkeet; Jalustat ja korokkeet; Tilanjakajatarvikkeet; Tilanjakajat; Hyllyt; Hyllyjen lisätarvikkeet; Sohvatarvikkeet; Sohvat; Pöytätarvikkeet; Pöydät
zh-TW: 家具: 嬰幼兒家具; 床和配件; 長椅/長凳; 櫥櫃和收納; 中島/推車; 椅用配件; 椅子; 坐臥沙發床; 娛樂中心/電視架; 家具組; 沙發床; 辦公室家具; 辦公家具配件; 墊腳軟凳; 戶外家具; 戶外家具配件; 柱座與基座; 隔間屏風配件; 隔間屏風; 收納層架; 層架組裝配件; 沙發配件; 沙發; 桌子配件; 桌
ru: Мебель: Мебель для детей и младенцев; Кровати и аксессуары для них; Скамьи; Шкафы и мебель для хранения; Тележки и острова; Аксессуары для кресел и стульев; Кресла и стулья; Тахты; Тумбы для телевизоров и аппаратуры; Наборы мебели; Футоны; Офисная мебель; Аксессуары для офисной мебели; Оттоманки; Уличная мебель; Аксессуары для уличной мебели; Пьедесталы и постаменты; Аксессуары для перегородок для помещений; Перегородки для помещений; Стеллажи и полки; Аксессуары для стеллажей; Аксессуары для диванов; Диваны; Аксессуары для столов; Столы
en: Furniture: Baby & Toddler Furniture; Beds & Accessories; Benches; Cabinets & Storage; Carts & Islands; Chair Accessories; Chairs; Daybeds; Entertainment Centers & TV Stands; Furniture Sets; Futons; Office Furniture; Office Furniture Accessories; Ottomans; Outdoor Furniture; Outdoor Furniture Accessories; Pedestals & Plinths; Room Divider Accessories; Room Dividers; Shelving; Shelving Accessories; Sofa Accessories; Sofas; Table Accessories; Tables
sk-SK: Nábytok: Detský nábytok; Príslušenstvo k posteliam; Lavice; Úložné skrinky; Vozíky a ostrovčeky; Príslušenstvo pre stoličky; Stoličky; Leňošky; Obývacia stena; Súpravy nábytku; Futóny; Kancelársky nábytok; Príslušenstvo ku kancelárskemu nábytku; Otomany; Exteriérový nábytok; Príslušenstvo ku exteriérovému nábytku; Podstavce a sokle; Príslušenstvo k paravánom; Paravány; Regály; Policové príslušenstvo; Príslušenstvo k pohovkám; Pohovky; Príslušenstvo k stolom; Stoly